Tennessee, session 114, SB0724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-202(b), is amended by deleting
the following language:
If any person fails to comply with this section, this expense account shall be
disallowed and the same shall not be paid.
and substituting instead:
If a person fails to comply with this subsection (b), the expense account must not
be paid, unless the assistant district attorney general or criminal investigator,
within five (5) days of the end of the month, submits the expense account with an
explanation for late submission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect June 30, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0724
000389
- 1 -